New Jersey, session 222, A5217.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: Emergency care provider means an emergency medical technician, paramedic, or member of a first aid, ambulance, or rescue squad. Emergency medical services provider means any association, organization, company, department, agency, service, program, unit, or other entity that provides pre-hospital emergency medical care to patients in this State including, but not limited to, a basic life support ambulance service, a mobile intensive care unit, an air medical service, or a volunteer or non-volunteer first aid, rescue, and ambulance squad. Law enforcement canine means a dog employed by a government entity for the principal purpose of aiding in the: (1) detection of missing persons, cadavers, criminal activity, flammable materials, or incendiary devices; (2) apprehension of criminal offenders; (3) enforcement of laws; or (4) investigation of fires. b.    (1)  An emergency medical services provider may transport to a veterinary clinic or similar facility a law enforcement canine that is injured during the course of duty if there is no person requiring medical attention or transport at the time. (2)   An emergency care provider certified or licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.101 (C.26:2K-65) or section 2 of P.L.1984, c.146 (C.26:2K-8) and trained in canine tactical combat casualty care or another emergency canine care protocol may provide emergency care to a law enforcement canine injured during the course of duty if there is no person requiring medical attention or transport at the time. (3)   A member of a volunteer first aid, rescue, or ambulance squad in compliance with training standards adopted by the New Jersey State First Aid Council pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1987, c.284 (C.27:5F-22) and trained in canine tactical combat casualty care or another emergency canine care protocol may provide emergency care to a law enforcement canine injured during the course of duty if there is no person requiring medical attention or transport at the time. c.     The Commissioner of Health and the Director of the Office of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 2.    An emergency medical services provider or emergency care provider acting in good faith and within the scope of applicable regulations promulgated pursuant to this act shall be immune from civil or criminal liability resulting from transport or care provided to a law enforcement canine. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the 13th month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Health and the Director of the Office of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety may take anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.